Utah statutes.
54-3-10.   Interchange of business required.

Every telephone corporation and telegraph corporation operating in this state shall receive, transmit, and deliver, without discrimination or delay, the conversations and messages of every other telephone or telegraph corporation with whose line a physical connection may have been made.

